Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202524-805
Judicial nominating commissions; members serve on more than one commission; residency requirements.

In conformity with the residency requirements of section 24-802, individual lawyer or citizen members of any judicial nominating commission may serve on more than one judicial nominating commission at the same time.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 5, p. 473;

Laws 1974, LB 785, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB388, § 3.